District of Columbia statutes.
1-614.11

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Agency” means any office, department, division, board, commission, or other agency of the District government, including both subordinate agency and independent agency, required by law or by the Mayor or Council to administer any law or any rule adopted under the authority of a law. The term “agency” does not include the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

(2)

“Performance measures” means the methods of gauging the outcomes and outputs of publicly funded activities through procedures and devices, including, but not limited to, existing agency records, citizen surveys, and trained observer ratings.

(3)

“Performance plan” means the strategic description of how an agency’s mission and goals will be accomplished and shall consist of functions, activities, operations, and projects and both qualitative and quantitative measures required for effective implementation. The performance plan shall also include the following:

(A)

Mission statement: A statement of central purpose of the organizational entity;

(B)

Objectives: Broad statements of the desired benefits from the performance of the central purpose; and

(C)

Goals: Target levels of performance expressed as a tangible, measurable objective, against which actual achievement can be compared, including a goal expressed as a quantitative standard, value, or rate.

(4)

“Performance report” means the annual device by which District agencies report to the Council on the progress of management employees and other personnel toward achieving the objectives and goals in the performance plan.

(5)

“Management employee” means any person whose functions include responsibility for project management and supervision of staff and the achievement of the project’s overall goals and objectives.

(6)

“Nonmanagement personnel” means any person whose functions do not include responsibility for project management or supervision of staff, and are subject to the control and supervision by management employees.

(7)

“Significant activities” means activities that are central to the functions, goals, and services of the agency, program, or project.

(8)

“Publicly funded” or “public funds” means support by any governmental source.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1411
as added May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 11-16, § 2(b), 42 DCR 1394
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 106, 47 DCR 520
This section is referenced in § 1-609.52, § 1-609.58, and § 4-1345.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-615.11.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subd. (3)(C), substituted “measurable” for “measureable”.